Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 44 Trespass and Vandalism

11-44-1.
Vandalism — Obstruction of lawful pursuits.

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously or mischievously injure or destroy or write upon, paint, or otherwise deface the property of another, or obstruct the use of the property of another, or obstruct another in the prosecution of his or her lawful business or pursuits, in any manner, the punishment of which is not specifically provided for by statute, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or be imprisoned not exceeding one year, and shall be liable to make restitution for the injury or damage caused. Every person convicted of a first offense under this section shall be required to perform up to one hundred (100) hours of public community restitution work, and for a second or subsequent conviction shall be required to perform up to two hundred (200) hours of public community restitution work. Provided, further that every person who shall willfully and maliciously or mischievously injure or destroy or write upon, paint or otherwise deface government property, or obstruct the use of that property, shall be punished in accordance with this statute. Jurisdiction for matters involving government property shall be concurrent with the district court or the respective city or town police or municipal court.

Where the provisions of The Domestic Violence Prevention Act, chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 45; P.L. 1902, ch. 964, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 48; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 48; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 48; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-1

; P.L. 1980, ch. 296, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 85, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 11; P.L. 1995, ch. 89, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 206, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 10.

11-44-2.
Injury or removal of vegetation — Buildings and fences.

Every person who shall take and carry away, without the consent of the owner, any corn, grain, fruit, or growing vegetable out of any field, garden, or orchard, or who shall willfully and without the consent of the owner root up, cut down, or otherwise injure or destroy or take and carry away any tree or underwood growing or standing upon the land of another, or remove any cord wood, or shall maliciously root up, cut down, or otherwise injure or destroy any tree, root, fruit, or vegetable growing in any garden, field, orchard, highway, common, or public square, or who shall take and carry away, without the consent of the owner, any cultivated plant, tree, or shrub from any graveyard or from any public or private grounds, or who shall wantonly or maliciously injure or destroy any plant or shrub growing upon the land or in the building of another, or who shall poison the earth about any plant or shrub so as to prevent or injure its growth, or who shall maliciously or wantonly in any way injure or deface any building not his or her own, or break the glass or any part of it in any building, or shall maliciously injure any fence or stone wall on or enclosing lands not his or her own, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding triple the value of the damage or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is lower; and shall be required to pay the party injured a penalty not to exceed triple the value of the damage caused by the person; provided, that if any person shall knowingly use or permit to be used any vehicle for the commission of any of the offenses enumerated in this section, he or she shall also be penalized in the manner specified in title 31.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 23; P.L. 1900, ch. 736, § 1; C.P.A. 1905, § 1177; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 23; P.L. 1928, ch. 1215, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-2

; P.L. 1980, ch. 276, § 2; P.L. 1982, ch. 237, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 426, § 1.

11-44-3.
Arrest and detention of persons taking fruits and vegetables.

Every deputy sheriff, town or city sergeant, town constable, or police officer, who shall discover any person or persons in the act of taking and carrying away any growing fruit or vegetables as prohibited by §

11-44-2

, shall arrest that person or persons and detain the person or persons in custody until a complaint can be made against him, her, or them for the offense for which he, she, or they shall have been arrested and until he, she, or they be taken on a warrant issued upon the complaint; provided, that the arrest and detention without a warrant shall not continue longer than the space of twenty-four (24) hours.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 24; P.L. 1928, ch. 1215, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 24; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-3

; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 40; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 17; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 17.

11-44-4.
Shooting, trapping or fishing on posted lands — Destruction of signs.

Whoever shall enter upon the land of another without the owner’s permission for the purpose of either shooting, trapping, or fishing when that land shall be conspicuously posted with clear and legible signs stating that shooting, trapping or fishing, as the case may be, is prohibited, or whoever shall remain upon the premises of another for the purpose of shooting, trapping, or fishing after having been forbidden to do so by the owner of the premises or the owner’s authorized agent, or whoever shall without right mutilate, destroy, or remove any sign stating that shooting, trapping or fishing, as the case may be, is prohibited, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1902, ch. 1006, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 136, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 137, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 248, § 19; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-4

; P.L. 1971, ch. 186, § 1.

11-44-5.
Willful damage while hunting, trapping or fishing.

Whoever shall enter upon land of another for the purpose of hunting, trapping or fishing, and while upon the land shall do any willful damage to the property of the owner of the land, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00). The owner of the property may recover from any person convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section, in an action of the case, twice the amount of the damages so sustained; and the license to pursue, hunt, and kill game in the state of Rhode Island during the open season issued under the provisions of chapter 13 of title 20 to any persons who shall thereafter be convicted of a violation of the provisions of this section shall be forfeited and no license shall be issued to him or her under the provisions of title 20 for a period of one year after that conviction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1921, ch. 2097, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 137, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 248, § 23; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-5

.

11-44-6.
Defacement of bank bills and notes.

Every person who shall willfully and mischievously tear, cut, burn, or in any other manner damage and impair the integrity, strength, or usefulness for circulation of any bank bill or note issued by any corporation which is established as a bank in this state, or shall willfully and mischievously write, print, blot, or stamp any impression on a bill or note, or shall aid and abet in any of the offenses provided in this section, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year nor less than one month.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 40; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 40; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 40; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-6

.

11-44-7.
Misappropriation of vehicle, boat, or animal.

Every person who shall willfully, mischievously, or without right, take, drive, ride, or use any carriage, wagon, or other vehicle other than a motor vehicle, or any boat, or any horse, ox, or cow, or milk any cow, the property of another, without the consent of the owner or of the person having the lawful custody of the property, shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both; provided that nothing contained in this section shall be construed to apply to any case where property is taken with the intent to steal the property or where it is taken under a claim of right.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 41; P.L. 1902, ch. 963, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 45; P.L. 1909, ch. 460, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 45; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 45; impl. am. P.L. 1950, ch. 2595, art. 12, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-7

; P.L. 1989, ch. 214, § 2.

11-44-8.
Injury to or interference with water-control structures.

Every person who shall willfully and maliciously break down, injure, remove, or destroy any dam, reservoir, canal, or trench, or any gate, flume, flash-board, or other appurtenance, or any of the wheels, mill-gear, or machinery of a water-mill, or willfully or wantonly, without color of right, draw off the water contained in a millpond, reservoir, canal, or trench, or willfully and maliciously, without color of right, obstruct the water of a mill-pond, reservoir, canal, or trench from flowing out of it, shall be imprisoned not exceeding five (5) years or be fined not exceeding two thousand dollars ($2,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 38; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 42; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 42; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 42; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-8

.

11-44-9.
Firing of weapon near baiting place.

Every person who, between the first day of April and the first day of November in any year, shall maliciously fire any gun, musket, blunderbuss, or pistol, within eighty (80) rods of any baiting place, not his or her own property, and actually used in the proper season for the baiting and netting of wild pigeons, shall be fined not exceeding twenty dollars ($20.00), nor less than five dollars ($5.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 28; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-9

.

11-44-10.
Injurious substances on baiting places.

Every person who shall strew or place any powder or brimstone or other sulfurous substance upon any baiting place not his or her own property, or shall burn upon that place any of those substances saturated with tar or turpentine, shall be fined not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty dollars ($20.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 29; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-10

.

11-44-11.
Injury to boundary or line markers.

Every person who shall willfully break down, remove, injure, obscure, or destroy any monument erected for the purpose of designating the boundaries of any town or city or any tract or lot of land, or any tree marked for that purpose, or any stake set up to mark the line or grade of any railroad, or any marker erected for the purpose of designating a public right-of-way to water areas of the state, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 34; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 38; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 38; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 38; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-11

; P.L. 1971, ch. 27, § 1.

11-44-12.
Injury to public property.

Every person who shall willfully cut or deface or otherwise injure any public building or fence or other property shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) unless the amount of damage exceeds one hundred dollars ($100). If that amount shall exceed one hundred dollars ($100), then he or she shall be punished by a fine which is not less than three (3) times the amount of the damage nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both, and, in addition to any sentence, shall be ordered to make restitution in the full amount of damage done.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 278, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-12

; P.L. 1982, ch. 243, §§ 1, 2.

11-44-12.1.
Damage to instrumentality of public transportation.

Every person who shall willfully cut or deface or otherwise injure any instrumentality of public transportation managed by or belonging to a public corporation shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment not exceeding thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 238, § 1.

11-44-13.
Injury to public statues and monuments.

Every person who shall willfully trespass upon, deface, mutilate, cover or keep covered, or otherwise injure the Soldiers’ and Sailors’ Monument in the city of Providence, or any other public statue or monument, may be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) and/or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, and shall, in addition to imprisonment and/or fine, be ordered to make full restitution to the public or governmental entity incurring the expense of repairing the statue or monument.

History of Section.

P.L. 1908, ch. 1542, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-13

; P.L. 2009, ch. 326, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 341, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 375, § 2.

11-44-14.
Breaking lamps or windows.

Every person who shall willfully break any lamp, lantern, or window shall, for every lamp, lantern, or window broken, be fined not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 278, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-14

; P.L. 1978, ch. 285, § 1.

11-44-15.
Injuring or destroying books and other property of libraries, archives, or other records repositories.

Any person who willfully, maliciously, or wantonly writes upon, injures, defaces, tears, cuts, mutilates, or destroys any book, record, or other property belonging to or in the custody of any public county or regional library, the state library, the state archives, the state records center or other repository of public records, museum, or any library or collection belonging to or in the custody of any educational, eleemosynary, benevolent, hereditary, or historical library, or patriotic institution, organization, or society, or state or local agency, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be ordered to make restitution in the full retail value of the books, records or other property, and may be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100), to be for use of the library, archives, or records repository.

“Book, records, or other property” as used in this section includes any book, plate, picture, photograph, engraving, painting, drawing, map, newspaper, magazine, pamphlet, broadside, manuscript, document, letter, public record, equipment, microform, sound recording, audiovisual materials in any format, magnetic or other tapes, electronic data processing records, artifacts, or other documentary, written, or printed material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, belonging to, on loan to, or otherwise in the custody of, any library, museum, archives, or repository of public or other records institution.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 52; P.L. 1907, ch. 1463, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 55; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 55; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 63; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-15

; P.L. 1983, ch. 296, §§ 3, 4; P.L. 1985, ch. 436, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 1.

11-44-16.
Removal of gravel from or deposit of debris on Easton’s Beach.

Every person who shall remove any sand or any gravel from any part of Easton’s Beach, as defined in §

11-44-18

, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) for every offense. Every person who shall deposit or leave on the beach any dead animal, offal, filth, rubbish, or refuse matter, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) for every offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 58; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 61; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 61; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 69; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-16

.

11-44-17.
Enforcement of § 11-44-16.

Any police constable of Newport or of Middletown, viewing any offense committed in violation of §

11-44-16

, shall immediately arrest the offender, whether in Newport or in Middletown, and cause him or her to be prosecuted for the offense as soon as may be possible before the district court.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 59; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 62; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 62; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-17

.

11-44-18.
Bounds of Easton’s Beach.

Easton’s Beach, for the purposes of §§

11-44-16

and

11-44-17

, shall embrace all the lands bounded and described as follows: a tract of land in Newport, bounded northerly on land now or formerly of George H. Norman, easterly on the division line between the town of Middletown and the city of Newport, southerly on the ocean at low-water mark, and westerly on land now or formerly of the Gibbs Land Company to the Bath Road, and along and across that road to and along the cliffs at land now or formerly of J. W. Chandler; and a tract of land in Middletown, bounded northerly on the northern side of a road which runs from the foot of Bath Road in Newport, easterly through the above bounded beach or land, and then onward over the lands between Easton’s Beach and Sachuest Beach, easterly on the line of the old fence or wall which has hitherto separated the upland of the Benjamin Easton Farm from Easton’s Beach and the sandy tract adjoining it, southerly on the ocean at low-water mark, and westerly on the division line between Newport and Middletown.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 279, § 60; G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 63; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 63; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 71; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-18

.

11-44-19.
Deposit of debris on Middletown beaches.

Every person who shall deposit or leave on any beach in the town of Middletown, any dead animal, offal, filth, rubbish, waste, or refuse matter, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00) for every offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 73; P.L. 1922, ch. 2225, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 74; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 72; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-19

.

11-44-20.
Property of life saving corps — Interference or deception.

Every person who shall willfully destroy any of the property or apparatus of the United States Volunteer Life Saving Corps, or steal or misappropriate it, or any part of it, or willfully interfere with any of its life savers in the performance of their duty, or who shall call for help or aid while in or on the water with intent to deceive any of the life savers, shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned not more than six (6) months, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 345, § 72; P.L. 1911, ch. 663, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 397, § 72; G.L. 1938, ch. 608, § 80; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-20

.

11-44-21.
Vandalizing alarms or call boxes — False alarms.

Whoever opens a signal box connected with a police, fire, or motorist aid call system for the purpose of giving or causing to be given a false alarm, or interferes in any way with a signal box by breaking, cutting, injuring, or defacing it; or, without authority, opens, tampers, or meddles with a signal box, or with any part or parts of it, or with the police signal wires, or with anything connected with it, or, with that purpose, willfully or knowingly tampers or meddles with a signal box connected with a fire signal system or with any part or thing connected with it, or, with that purpose, willfully or knowingly tampers or meddles with a motorist aid call box, or by any means gives or aids or abets in the giving of a false alarm of fire or emergency or falsely summons an ambulance or rescue apparatus, shall be subject to punishment by imprisonment for up to one year, or fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500), or both. Upon conviction for any offense referred to in this section, the court shall, in addition to imposing a fine and/or imprisonment, order the offender to make restitution to the appropriate state, city, or town authority or agency for any expenditures necessitated by the commission of the offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 278, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 344, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 396, § 7; P.L. 1928, ch. 1155, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 607, § 7; P.L. 1941, ch. 1009, § 1; P.L. 1942, ch. 1238, § 1; P.L. 1952, ch. 2881, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-44-21

; P. L. 1971, ch. 211, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 153, §§ 1, 2.

11-44-21.1.
Graffiti — Defacing private residences, offices, businesses or commercial property.

Every person who shall willfully, maliciously or mischievously write upon, paint, or otherwise deface the private property or residence of another, any office building, business or commercial property or public building or public property, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, for the first and second offense, said penalty shall not exceed a one thousand dollars ($1,000) fine and community service not exceeding two hundred (200) hours. Every person convicted of a third or subsequent offense under this section shall be guilty of a felony, subject to imprisonment not exceeding two (2) years, a fine of up to two thousand dollars ($2,000), and shall be required to perform up to three hundred (300) hours of community service. The court, upon conviction or adjudication, shall order restitution to the victim in the amount of removal, repair, or replacement costs.

If the graffiti is positioned on an overpass or an underpass and requires that traffic be interfered with in order to remove it, or the entity responsible for the area in which the clean-up is to take place must provide assistance in order for the removal to take place safely, the court shall order an additional assessment of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

If the person is a minor, upon adjudication, in addition to the penalties in subsection (a):

The family court may, in addition to any other order or decree the court makes under this chapter, order the division of motor vehicles to:

Suspend the minor’s operator’s license; or

Invalidate the minor’s learner’s permit; for one year beginning the date of the order.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the family court may order the parent or legal guardian of any minor found to have committed the crime of graffiti, to submit restitution to the victim or victims of such graffiti by payment in money if the minor is in the custody of and residing with such parent or guardian, and if the family court finds, after hearing, that the graffiti was a direct result of the parent or legal guardian having neglected to exercise reasonable supervision and control of the minor’s conduct. For the purposes of this section, liability for compensation shall be limited to ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

If the person violates the family court’s order to submit restitution under this section, such person shall be guilty of contempt. The court may permit payments under this section to be made in installments, for a period of up to seven (7) years, to be administered by the court.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 497, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 508, § 1.

11-44-21.2.
Restitution or removal of graffiti — Rescission of order suspending or invalidating operator’s license or learner’s permit.

If a court of suitable jurisdiction has entered an order for suspension or invalidation of a minor’s operator’s license or a learner’s permit pursuant to §

11-44-21.1

, and if the same court subsequently determines that the minor has fulfilled his or her restitution obligation, the court may:

Rescind the order for suspension or invalidation; and/or

Allow the minor to receive a license or permit before the period of suspension or invalidation ends.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 497, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 508, § 2.

11-44-22.
Throwing articles at moving vehicles.

Every person who shall willfully throw, shoot, or in any other manner propel a snowball or any other object at any moving motor or other vehicle in use upon the roads or highways of this state shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1967, ch. 124, § 1.

11-44-23.
Throwing objects at police officer, firefighter or police or fire vehicles.

Every person who shall willfully throw, shoot, or in any other manner propel a rock or any other object at any police officer, firefighter, or any police or fire vehicle, whether moving or not, shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 268, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 221, § 1.

11-44-24.
Blocking or obstructing public rights-of-way to water.

Every person who shall obstruct or block or cause any obstruction of any public rights-of-way to water areas of the state shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 23, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 142, § 1.

11-44-25.
Deposit of debris on public rights-of-way to water.

Every person who shall deposit or leave on any public right-of-way to water areas of the state, any dead animal, offal, filth, rubbish, waste, or refuse matter, shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for every offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1971, ch. 22, § 1.

11-44-26.
Willful trespass — Remaining on land after warning — Exemption for tenants holding over.

Every person who willfully trespasses or, having no legitimate purpose for his or her presence, remains upon the land of another or upon the premises or curtilage of the domicile of any person legally entitled to the possession of that domicile, after having been forbidden to do so by the owner of the land or the owner’s duly authorized agent or a person legally entitled to the possession of the premises, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for a term not exceeding one year, or both.

This section shall not apply to tenants or occupants of residential premises who, having rightfully entered the premises at the commencement of the tenancy or occupancy, remain after that tenancy or occupancy has been or is alleged to have been terminated. The owner or landlord of the premises may recover possession only through appropriate civil proceedings.

Where the provisions of The Domestic Violence Prevention Act, chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 279, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 175, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 360, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 52, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 11.

11-44-26.1.
Mandatory minimum fine for willful trespass within school buildings.

Every person who willfully trespasses or, having no legitimate purpose for his or her presence, or having been suspended from attendance at any school, remains within a building used for a public or private school, college, university, junior college, or other public or private educational institution, or on the school grounds or campus grounds of any public or private school, college, university, junior college, or other public or private educational institution after having been forbidden so to do by a local or state police officer or a guard, security officer, or an official of the school, college, university, junior college or other educational institution, shall for the first offense be punished at least by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and shall for the second offense be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and for the third or any subsequent offense by a fine of not less than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and may in addition, be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months.

History of Section.

P.L. 1983, ch. 52, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 183, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 197, § 1.

11-44-27.
Fishing from Jamestown Bridge prohibited.

No person shall take or attempt to take any fish from the waters of Narragansett Bay while the person is on any part of the roadway, walkway, or railings of the Jamestown Bridge, except a special walkway as may be constructed exclusively for the purpose of fishing. Any person violating any provision of this section shall, upon conviction, be fined twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or imprisoned for not more than thirty (30) days, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 284, § 1.

11-44-28.
Trespass upon premises of private recreational facilities.

Every person who willfully trespasses and remains upon the land or premises of private recreational facilities, after having been forbidden to do so by the owner or the person having control over the facility, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500); provided, the existing rights of fishers shall not be infringed. “Facilities” as used in this section means private property used for games, sports, or entertainment, including, without limitation, golf courses, beaches, and bathing facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 68, § 1.

11-44-29.
Willful breaking of glass.

Every person who shall willfully break glass on any public highway, public property, or public building within this state shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 188, § 1.

11-44-30.
Posting of signs — Types.

Whenever any signs are required to be posted to indicate no trespassing, shooting, trapping, fishing, or the like, it shall be sufficient to post the land conspicuously with clear and legible signs which signs can be affixed with cloth, metal, or paperboard, or by conspicuously stencil-painting the word “Posted.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 195, § 1.

11-44-31.
Desecration of places of public assemblage.

Every person who shall, willfully and maliciously or mischievously, injure or destroy or write upon, paint, or otherwise damage or deface: (1) any church, synagogue, or other building, structure, or place used for religious worship or other religious purpose; (2) any cemetery, mortuary, or other facility used for the purpose of burial or memorializing the dead; (3) any building used for educational purposes or as a community meeting place and which is owned by an organization exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501; (4) any public building owned and/or operated by the government of the United States or by the government of the state of Rhode Island or its political subdivisions; (5) the grounds adjacent to and owned or rented by any institution, facility, building, structure, or place described in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section; or (6) any personal property contained in any institution, facility, building, structure, or place described in subdivisions (1), (2), (3), (4), or (5) of this section; shall be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or imprisonment not exceeding five (5) years, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 374, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 512, § 1.

11-44-32.
Clearance of public rights of way.

Every person, firm, or corporation who is the owner of land abutting a public sidewalk shall keep the sidewalk free of any shrubs or other debris under the control of the owner. The owner shall also be required to see that the branches of any tree under his or her control which overhang a public sidewalk are at least seven (7) feet above the sidewalk.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall, upon adjudication be subject to a civil penalty of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 396, § 1.